Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202532-716.01
New political party; petition; form.

In addition to the requirements of section 32-716, the form of a petition to form a new political party shall be substantially as follows:

Petition for Formation of a New Political Party

Name of Party to be Formed: ............

Purpose of Party: ............

To the Honorable ............, Secretary of State for the State of Nebraska:

We, the undersigned residents of the State of Nebraska and the county of ............, respectfully demand that the above-named new political party be formed in the State of Nebraska, and each for himself or herself says:

I have personally signed this petition on the date opposite my name;

I am a registered voter of the State of Nebraska and the county of ............ and am qualified to sign this petition or I will be so registered and qualified on or before the date on which this petition is filed with the Secretary of State; and

My printed name, date of birth, street and number or voting precinct, and city, village, or post office address are correctly written after my signature.

(Here follow numbered lines for signature, printed name, date of birth, date, street and number or voting precinct, and city, village, or post office address.)

Laws 2025, LB521, § 59.